Florida, session 2026, HB6023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) and
paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (7) of section 1002.333,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1002.333 Persistently low-performing schools.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(c) "Persistently low-performing school" means a school
that meets at least one of the following criteria:
1. A school that has earned three grades lower than a "C,"
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6023-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6023 2026
pursuant to s. 1008.34, in at least 3 of the previous 5 years
that the school received a grade and has not earned a grade of
"B" or higher in the most recent 2 school years; or
2. A school that was closed pursuant to s. 1008.33(4)
within 2 years after the submission of a notice of intent; or
3. A school in the bottom 10 percent in at least 2 of the
previous 3 years for student performance on the end-of-year
administration of the coordinated screening and progress
monitoring system for grade 3 English Language Arts or grade 4
mathematics as prescribed in s. 1008.22(3)(a)2.
(d) "School of hope" means:
1. A charter school operated by a hope operator which:
a. Serves students from one or more persistently low-
performing schools or students who reside in a Florida
Opportunity Zone; and
b. Is located in a Florida Opportunity Zone or in the
attendance zone of a persistently low-performing school or
within a 5-mile radius of such school, whichever is greater. A
school of hope may be located outside of a Florida Opportunity
Zone or persistently low-performing school attendance zone if
the school district does not have underused, vacant, or surplus
property available for the hope operator to use within a Florida
Opportunity Zone or persistently low-performing school
attendance zone; and
c. Is a Title I eligible school; or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6023-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6023 2026
2. A school operated by a hope operator pursuant to s.
1008.33(4)(b)3.
(7) FACILITIES.—
(a) A school of hope shall use facilities that comply with
the Florida Building Code, except for the State Requirements for
Educational Facilities. A school of hope that uses school
district facilities must comply with the State Requirements for
Educational Facilities only if the school district and the hope
operator have entered into a mutual management plan for the
reasonable maintenance of such facilities. The mutual management
plan shall contain a provision by which the district school
board agrees to maintain the school facilities in the same
manner as its other public schools within the district. A school
of hope may colocate with another school in a public school
facility. The school district must permit any school of hope to
use all or part of underused, vacant, or surplus school district
facilities, and receive facility-related services, pursuant to
State Board of Education rule. Students enrolled in the school
of hope shall be included in the district's total capital outlay
full-time equivalent membership for the purpose of s. 1013.62
and for calculating the Public Education Capital Outlay
maintenance funds or any other maintenance funds for the
facility. The local governing authority shall not adopt or
impose any local building requirements or site-development
restrictions, such as parking and site-size criteria, student
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6023-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6023 2026
enrollment, and occupant load, that are addressed by and more
stringent than those found in the State Requirements for
Educational Facilities of the Florida Building Code. A local
governing authority must treat schools of hope equitably in
comparison to similar requirements, restrictions, and site
planning processes imposed upon public schools. The agency
having jurisdiction for inspection of a facility and issuance of
a certificate of occupancy or use shall be the local
municipality or, if in an unincorporated area, the county
governing authority. If an official or employee of the local
governing authority refuses to comply with this paragraph, the
aggrieved school or entity has an immediate right to bring an
action in circuit court to enforce its rights by injunction. An
aggrieved party that receives injunctive relief may be awarded
reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
(d) No later than January 1, the department shall annually
provide to school districts a list of all underused, vacant, or
surplus facilities owned or operated by the school district as
reported in the Florida Inventory of School Houses. A school
district may provide evidence to the department that a facility
includes prekindergarten students who are not reported for
funding in the Florida Education Finance Program or that the
list contains errors or omissions within 30 days after receipt
of the list. By each April 1, the department shall update and
100 publish a final list of all underused, vacant, or surplus
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6023-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6023 2026
101 facilities owned or operated by each school district, based upon
102 updated information provided by each school district. A hope
103 operator establishing a school of hope may use an educational
104 facility identified in this paragraph at no cost. A hope
105 operator using a facility pursuant to this paragraph may not
106 sell or dispose of such facility without the written permission
107 of the school district. For purposes of this paragraph, the term
108 "underused, vacant, or surplus facility" means an entire
109 facility or portion thereof which is not fully used or is used
110 irregularly or intermittently by the school district for
111 instructional or program use.
112 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6023-00